Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.130

Public stadium authority officers and employees—Expenses.

The board of directors of the public stadium authority may authorize payment of actual and necessary expenses of officers and employees for lodging, meals, and travel-related costs incurred in attending meetings or conferences on behalf of the public stadium authority and strictly in the public interest and for public purposes. Officers and employees may be advanced sufficient sums to cover their anticipated expenses in accordance with rules adopted by the state auditor, which shall substantially conform to the procedures provided in RCW 43.03.150 through 43.03.210.

[ 1997 c 220 s 112 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]